Massachusetts, session 194th, H2439.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 8 of chapter 111D of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 22 after the words “upon the written
request of” the following:- the person from whose body the specimen was derived.
SECTION 2. Section 8 of Chapter 111D of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is further amended by inserting in line 34 after the words “patients” the
following:-
A laboratory test ordered under this section, regardless of test complexity, as defined
under the Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments of 1988, shall be conducted by a
laboratory that routinely participates in proficiency testing for such offered test in a program
approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. This paragraph shall not be
construed to mandate proficiency testing for a laboratory test if it is not available from any
approved program.
of 1